Florida, session 2026, HB4091.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
21
22 Section 1. Legislative findings.—The Legislature finds
23 that:
24 (1) The University Town Center area is a largely
25 commercially zoned area located at the intersection of I-75 and
Page 1 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
26 University Parkway that extends into both Sarasota and Manatee
27 Counties near the Lakewood Ranch planned community.
28 (2) The University Town Center area of Sarasota and
29 Manatee Counties have experienced unprecedented growth as
30 commercial development, tourism events, sport competitions,
31 entertainment, and recreational activities have drawn residents
32 and visitors to the region.
33 (3) The University Town Center area contains more than 3
34 million square feet of commercial development with plans to
35 double in size over the next 20 years. Estimates of the
36 University Town Center development's total economic activity
37 exceed $3.5 billion, supporting more than 15,000 permanent jobs.
38 More than 1 million square feet of commercial development
39 immediately adjacent to the University Town Center contributes
40 significant additional economic impact to the area.
41 (4) The University Town Center area is located on the
42 county line of Sarasota and Manatee Counties and has become a
43 significant economic catalyst of the Florida economy, supporting
44 the continued development of tourist development attractions at
45 Nathan Benderson Park and Mote Science Education Aquarium
46 ("MoteSEA"), the planned expansion of the sports complex at
47 Nathan Benderson Park, and the attraction of international
48 events such as the 2017 World Rowing Championships and planned
49 2028 "Mega-Worlds" World Rowing Championship.
50 (5) Visit Florida and Visit Sarasota have independently
Page 2 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
51 verified that Nathan Benderson Park, located within the
52 University Town Center area, has generated over $200 million of
53 regional economic impact since Sarasota County's initial
54 allocation of Tourist Development revenue to the project.
55 (6) The University Town Center and Nathan Benderson Park
56 have led to the development of significant additional projects
57 such as MoteSEA. MoteSEA will independently generate $28 million
58 annually to the local economy, attract approximately 700,000
59 visitors, support $120 million in wages, and produce $2.4
60 million in direct tax revenue.
61 (7) The property owners within the University Town Center
62 area have developed and redeveloped the commercial, retail,
63 dining, and entertainment areas with a comprehensive water
64 control plan that provides drainage and water control
65 infrastructure and protection to the commercial properties in
66 the area, and also the surrounding adjacent commercial and
67 residential properties. The flood control measures and
68 mitigation have also facilitated the creation of recreational
69 facilities that attract local, national, and international
70 sports and tourism activities to the region.
71 (8) The property owners within the University Town Center
72 have also constructed and maintained roadways, sidewalks,
73 pedestrian walkways, and supporting infrastructure, including
74 landscaping, signage, and street lighting, to provide
75 connectivity to ongoing attractions and entertainment within the
Page 3 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
76 area.
77 (9) The property owners within the University Town Center
78 have organized, funded, promoted, and facilitated numerous
79 regional and seasonal entertainment attractions, including
80 large-scale holiday lighting and community events.
81 (10) Recreational, sports tourism, and other seasonal
82 entertainment events are promoted and encouraged to support the
83 commercial activities throughout the University Town Center area
84 and Sarasota and Manatee Counties.
85 (11) The property owners seek to ensure that there is an
86 ongoing source of funding to continue the multi-county
87 comprehensive stormwater and flood control management program.
88 (12) The property owners within the University Town Center
89 area seek to create an improvement district to ensure the
90 ongoing funding for the continuation of the above described
91 services with the powers and authority to sufficiently address
92 drainage and flood control needs in the most efficient, least
93 intrusive, and most cost-effective manner.
94 (13) The creation of an improvement district that
95 continues the current level of service to the University Town
96 Center area serves a public purpose of providing for the health,
97 safety, and welfare of property owners within the area, and
98 other properties proximate to the region.
99 Section 2. Legislative intent.–Based upon the foregoing
100 findings, it is the intent of the Legislature to create and
Page 4 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
101 constitute the University Town Center Improvement District for
102 the purposes of providing the services and infrastructure
103 authorized in this act. It is the intent of the Legislature in
104 enacting this law to provide a single, comprehensive special act
105 charter for the district within its jurisdictional boundaries,
106 including all legislative authority granted to the district by
107 this act, and authority granted by applicable general law.
108 Section 3. The University Town Center Improvement District
109 ("district").—The University Town Center Improvement District is
110 created as an independent special district in Sarasota and
111 Manatee Counties. The district is organized and exists for all
112 purposes and shall hold all powers set forth in this act and
113 chapters 189 and 197, Florida Statutes, except as otherwise
114 provided for in this act. The district charter may be amended
115 only by special act of the Legislature.
116 Section 4. The Charter for the University Town Center
117 Improvement District.—The Charter for the University Town Center
118 Improvement District is created to read:
119 Section 1. Name and corporate status.—
120 (1) The name of the district is the "University Town
121 Center Improvement District."
122 (2) The district shall be an independent special district
123 of the State of Florida located within Sarasota and Manatee
124 Counties. The district shall be a body corporate and politic
125 organized for the purposes of providing the services and
Page 5 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
126 infrastructure authorized within chapters 189 and 298, Florida
127 Statutes, as specified in this special act.
128 Section 2. District boundaries.—The lands included within
129 the University Town Center Improvement District territorial
130 boundaries shall consist of the following described lands in
131 Sarasota and Manatee Counties, and excluding described lands set
132 forth herein:
133
134 A. Lands in Sarasota County, Florida:
135 A PARCEL OF LAND LYING AND BEING IN SECTIONS 1, 2, 12, 13,
136 AND 24, TOWNSHIP 36 SOUTH, RANGE 18 EAST, MANATEE COUNTY,
137 FLORIDA. BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
138
139 BEGINNING AT THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID SECTION 36;
140 THENCE ALONG THE SOUTH LINE OF SAID SECTION 36 THE
141 FOLLOWING TWO (2) COURSES: (1) THENCE S.89°23'53"E. A
142 DISTANCE OF 2705.83'; (2) THENCE S.89°25'07"E. A DISTANCE
143 OF 441.01'; THENCE S.00°19'15"W. A DISTANCE OF 27.07' TO
144 THE RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF INTERSTATE 75, (STATE ROAD 93) AS
145 SHOWN ON THE FLORIDA DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION RIGHT OF
146 WAY MAPS, SECTION 13075- 2402; THENCE ALONG SAID LIMITED
147 ACCESS RIGHT OF WAY THE FOLLOWING THIRTY (30) COURSES: (1)
148 THENCE S.00°35'18"W. A DISTANCE OF 19.93'; (2) THENCE
149 S.89°24'42"E. A DISTANCE OF 491.02'; (3) THENCE
150 S.85°35'51"E. A DISTANCE OF 280.94'; (4) THENCE
Page 6 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
151 S.85°35'51"E. A DISTANCE OF 182.00'; (5) THENCE WITH A
152 CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 460.20', A
153 RADIUS OF 456.00', A CHORD BEARING OF S.56°41'08"E., A
154 CHORD LENGTH OF 440.92', AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 57°49'26";
155 (6) THENCE S.27°46'25"E. A DISTANCE OF 566.67'; (7) THENCE
156 WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF
157 1014.76', A RADIUS OF 4489.66', A CHORD BEARING OF
158 S.21°17'55"E., A CHORD LENGTH OF 1012.60', AND A DELTA
159 ANGLE OF 12°57'00"; (8) THENCE WITH A COMPOUND CURVE
160 TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 890.04', A
161 RADIUS OF 11083.95', A CHORD BEARING OF S.12°31'24"E., A
162 CHORD LENGTH OF 889.80', AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 04°36'03";
163 (9) THENCE WITH A COMPOUND CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH
164 AN ARC LENGTH OF 1069.03', A RADIUS OF 7509.45', A CHORD
165 BEARING OF S.03°59'41"E., A CHORD LENGTH OF 1068.13', AND A
166 DELTA ANGLE OF 08°09'23"; (10) THENCE S.00°05'12"W. A
167 DISTANCE OF 594.90'; (11) THENCE S.00°35'27"W. A DISTANCE
168 OF 1076.59'; (12) THENCE S.00°11'42"W. A DISTANCE OF
169 783.81'; (13) THENCE S.00°11'26"W. A DISTANCE OF 1856.86';
170 (14) THENCE S.00°12'28"W. A DISTANCE OF 802.20'; (15)
171 THENCE S.00°12'27"W. A DISTANCE OF 1838.46'; (16) THENCE
172 S.00°11'26"W. A DISTANCE OF 809.32'; (17) THENCE
173 S.89°48'25"E. A DISTANCE OF 25.00'; (18) THENCE
174 S.00°13'22"W. A DISTANCE OF 1833.27'; (19) THENCE
175 S.00°13'51"W. A DISTANCE OF 809.57'; (20) THENCE
Page 7 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
176 S.00°12'44"W. A DISTANCE OF 936.16'; (21) THENCE
177 S.01°28'49"W. A DISTANCE OF 866.39'; (22) THENCE
178 S.05°28'49"W. A DISTANCE OF 219.30'; (23) THENCE
179 S.05°28'49"W. A DISTANCE OF 309.52'; (24) THENCE
180 S.11°52'47"W. A DISTANCE OF 294.54'; (25) THENCE
181 S.24°28'46"W. A DISTANCE OF 30.73'; (26) THENCE
182 N.89°51'47"W. A DISTANCE OF 110.87'; (27) THENCE
183 S.30°42'52"W. A DISTANCE OF 499.12'; (28) THENCE
184 S.30°42'52"W. A DISTANCE OF 746.86'; (29) THENCE WITH A
185 CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 466.57', A
186 RADIUS OF 462.74', A CHORD BEARING OF S.59°35'59"W., A
187 CHORD LENGTH OF 447.06', AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 57°46'14";
188 (30) THENCE S.88°29'06"W. A DISTANCE OF 426.17' TO THE
189 SOUTHWEST CORNER OF LOT 1 GATEWAY TO SARASOTA, PHASE 1, AS
190 RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 39 PAGE 12 OF THE PUBLIC RECORD OF
191 SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA.; THENCE S.88°29'06"W. A DISTANCE
192 OF 118.01' TO A POINT ON THE EAST LINE OF TRACT 1 OF SAID
193 GATEWAY TO SARASOTA, PHASE 1,; THENCE S.01°28'17"E., ALONG
194 SAID EAST LINE, A DISTANCE OF 17.91' TO THE SOUTHEAST
195 CORNER OF SAID TRACT 1; THENCE S.88°31'43"W., ALONG THE
196 SOUTH LINE OF SAID TRACT 1, A DISTANCE OF 585.08' TO THE
197 SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID TRACT 1; THENCE N.00°18'12"E.,
198 ALONG THE WEST LINE OF SAID TRACT 1 AND THE EAST LINE OF
199 WHITAKER PARK, AS RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 48, PAGE 22 OF THE
200 PUBLIC RECORDS OF SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA, A DISTANCE OF
Page 8 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
201 2107.53' TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAID WHITAKER PARK AND
202 THE SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF RICHARDSON ROAD; THENCE
203 ALONG SAID SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINE THE FOLLOWING FOUR (4)
204 COURSES: (1) THENCE N.89°36'06"E. A DISTANCE OF 1692.47';
205 (2) THENCE WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC
206 LENGTH OF 236.10', A RADIUS OF 729.87', A CHORD BEARING OF
207 S.81°09'19"E., A CHORD LENGTH OF 235.07', AND A DELTA ANGLE
208 OF 18°32'02"; (3) THENCE S.71°45'22"E. A DISTANCE OF
209 250.04'; (4) THENCE WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE LEFT WITH
210 AN ARC LENGTH OF 50.80', A RADIUS OF 658.06', A CHORD
211 BEARING OF S.73°44'15"E., A CHORD LENGTH OF 50.79', AND A
212 DELTA ANGLE OF 04°25'24" TO THE INTERSECTION OF THE
213 WESTERLY RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF N. CATTLEMEN ROAD; THENCE
214 N.19°08'29"E. A DISTANCE OF 101.18' TO THE INTERSECTION OF
215 THE WEST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF CATTLEMEN ROAD AND THE NORTH
216 RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF RICHARDSON ROAD AS RECORDED IN
217 OFFICIAL RECORDS BOOK INSTRUMENT NUMBER 2001049630; THENCE
218 ALONG SAID NORTH RIGHT OF WAY LINE THE FOLLOWING THREE (3)
219 COURSES: (1) THENCE N.72°09'38"W. A DISTANCE OF 244.89';
220 (2) THENCE WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE LEFT WITH AN ARC
221 LENGTH OF 276.88', A RADIUS OF 869.34', A CHORD BEARING OF
222 N.81°17'05"W., A CHORD LENGTH OF 275.71', AND A DELTA ANGLE
223 OF 18°14'54"; (3) THENCE S.89°35'28"W. A DISTANCE OF
224 426.49' TO THE EAST LINE OF DEER HOLLOW UNIT IA, AS
225 RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 30, PAGE 5, OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF
Page 9 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
226 SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE N.00°08'26"W., ALONG SAID
227 EAST LINE, A DISTANCE OF 1417.17' TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER
228 OF SAN PALERMO AS RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 45, PAGE 9, OF THE
229 PUBLIC RECORD OF SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE ALONG THE
230 SOUTH LINE OF SAID SAN PALERMO THE FOLLOWING THREE (3)
231 COURSES: (1) THENCE N.89°51'34"E. A DISTANCE OF 641.75';
232 (2) THENCE S.00°12'17"W. A DISTANCE OF 157.17'; (3) THENCE
233 N.89°54'09"E. A DISTANCE OF 328.46' TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER
234 OF SAID SAN PALERMO AND THE WEST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF
235 CATTLEMEN ROAD AS RECORDED IN OFFICIAL RECORDS BOOK
236 INSTRUMENT NUMBER 2001049630; THENCE ALONG THE SAID WEST
237 RIGHT OF WAY LINE AND THE EAST LINE OF SAID SAN PALERMO THE
238 FOLLOWING TWO (2) COURSES: (1) THENCE N.00°12'17"E. A
239 DISTANCE OF 518.74'; (2) THENCE N.00°13'01"E. A DISTANCE OF
240 819.26' TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAID SAN PALERMO; THENCE
241 S.89°20'24"E. A DISTANCE OF 69.91'; THENCE N.00°13'21"E. A
242 DISTANCE OF 662.07'; THENCE N.89°26'46"W. A DISTANCE OF
243 69.95' TO THE WESTERLY RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF CATTLEMEN ROAD
244 AS RECORDED IN OFFICIAL RECORD INSTRUMENT NUMBER
245 2008032343, 2008030381, AND 2008032590 OF THE PUBLIC
246 RECORDS OF SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE ALONG SAID
247 WESTERLY RIGHT OF WAY LINE THE FOLLOWING FOUR (4) COURSES:
248 (1) THENCE N.00°12'38"E. A DISTANCE OF 166.76'; (2) THENCE
249 WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE LEFT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF
250 487.42', A RADIUS OF 2799.35', A CHORD BEARING OF
Page 10 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
251 N.04°46'39"W., A CHORD LENGTH OF 486.81', AND A DELTA ANGLE
252 OF 09°58'35"; (3) THENCE N.09°47'13"W. A DISTANCE OF
253 52.28'; (4) THENCE WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH
254 AN ARC LENGTH OF 436.90', A RADIUS OF 2933.52', A CHORD
255 BEARING OF N.05°31'13"W., A CHORD LENGTH OF 436.50', AND A
256 DELTA ANGLE OF 08°32'00" TO THE SOUTH LINE OF NATHAN
257 BENDERSON PARK AS RECORDED IN OFFICIAL RECORDS BOOK 2805,
258 PAGE 797OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA;
259 THENCE ALONG THE SOUTHERLY LINE OF SAID NATHAN BENDERSON
260 PARK THE FOLLOWING FIVE (5) COURSES: (1) THENCE
261 S.89°27'01"W. A DISTANCE OF 1223.82'; (2) THENCE
262 S.00°33'03"W. A DISTANCE OF 100.00'; (3) THENCE
263 S.88°53'04"W. A DISTANCE OF 982.23'; (4) THENCE
264 S.00°03'03"E. A DISTANCE OF 100.00'; (5) THENCE
265 S.89°29'06"W. A DISTANCE OF 329.89' TO THE EAST LINE OF
266 DEER HOLLOW UNIT NO. V, AS RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 34, PAGE
267 20, OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA ALSO
268 BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN
269 INSTRUMENT NUMBER 2006043641 OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF
270 SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE N.00°02'26"W. ALONG THE
271 EASTERLY LINE OF PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN INSTRUMENT NUMBER
272 2006043641, A DISTANCE OF 270.11'; THENCE N.89°41'17"W.
273 ALONG THE NORTHERLY LINE OF PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN
274 INSTRUMENT NUMBER 2006043641 AND THE NORTHERLY LINE OF SAID
275 DEER HOLLOW UNIT V, A DISTANCE OF 685.53' TO THE NORTHWEST
Page 11 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
276 CORNER OF SAID DEER HOLLOW ALSO BEING THE NORTHEAST CORNER
277 OF DEER HOLLOW UNIT VI, AS RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 34, PAGE 9
278 OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE
279 N.89°41'27"W. ALONG THE NORTH LINE OF SAID DEER HOLLOW UNIT
280 VI, A DISTANCE OF 685.40'; THENCE N.00°16'06"W. A DISTANCE
281 OF 160.11'; THENCE N.89°42'44"W. A DISTANCE OF 1310.71' TO
282 THE EAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF HONORE AVENUE AS RECORDED IN
283 OFFICIAL RECORDS BOOK 1383, PAGE 1923 OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS
284 OF SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE ALONG SAID EAST RIGHT
285 OF WAY LINE THE FOLLOWING THREE (3) COURSES: (1) THENCE
286 N.00°29'01"W. A DISTANCE OF 648.48'; (2) THENCE
287 S.89°49'20"E. A DISTANCE OF 15.00'; (3) THENCE
288 N.00°29'01"W. A DISTANCE OF 60.00' TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER
289 OF THE MEADOWS UNIT 16, AS RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 33, PAGE
290 25 OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF SARASOTA COUNTY FLORIDA; THENCE
291 S.89°49'20"E., ALONG THE SOUTH LINE OF SAID MEADOWS, AND
292 THE SOUTH LINE OF DEVONSHIRE PLACE, AS RECORDED IN PLAT
293 BOOK 35, PAGE 2, OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF SARASOTA COUNTY,
294 FLORIDA AND THE SOUTH LINE OF STRATFIELD PARK PHASE II, AS
295 RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 35, PAGE 16, OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF
296 SARASOTA COUNTY FLORIDA, A DISTANCE OF 2673.35'; THENCE
297 N.00°33'48"E. ALONG THE EAST LINE OF STRATFIELD PARK PH II
298 PLAT, BOOK 35, PAGE 16, STRATFIELD PARK PH I, PLAT BOOK 34,
299 PAGE 49, THE MEADOWS UNIT 15, PLAT BOOK 32, PAGE 45, THE
300 MEADOWS UNIT 14, PLAT BOOK 31, PAGE 29, AND THE MEADOWS
Page 12 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
301 UNIT 12, PLAT BOOK 30, PAGE 30, ALL RECORDED IN THE PUBLIC
302 RECORDS OF SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA, A DISTANCE OF 5251.19'
303 TO THE SOUTH QUARTER CORNER OF SECTION 1; THENCE
304 N.00°31'10"E. ALONG THE EAST LINE OF HE SOUTHWEST QUARTER
305 OF SAID SECTION 1, A DISTANCE OF 1336.87' TO THE NORTHEAST
306 CORNER OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF THE SOUTHWEST QUARTER OF
307 SAID SECTION 1; THENCE N.89°14'52"W. ALONG THE NORTH LINE
308 OF THE SOUTH ONE HALF OF THE SOUTHWEST QUARTER OF SAID
309 SECTION 1, A DISTANCE OF 2447.68'; THENCE N.00°30'14"E. A
310 DISTANCE OF 35.72'; THENCE N.53°37'49"W. A DISTANCE OF
311 186.41'; THENCE S.59°21'24"W. A DISTANCE OF 71.20' TO THE
312 EAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF HONORE AVENUE; THENCE ALONG THE
313 EAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF HONORE AVENUE AS RECORDED IN
314 INSTRUMENT NUMBER 2007185497, OFFICIAL RECORDS BOOK 2486,
315 PAGE 95, AND OFFICIAL RECORDS BOOK 2653, PAGE 1728, PUBLIC
316 RECORDS OF SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA THE FOLLOWING FIVE (5)
317 COURSES: (1) THENCE N.00°30'14"E. A DISTANCE OF 973.13';
318 (2) THENCE N.14°40'08"E. A DISTANCE OF 49.04'; (3) THENCE
319 N.00°30'14"E. A DISTANCE OF 239.64'; (4) THENCE WITH A
320 CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 29.88', A
321 RADIUS OF 35.00', A CHORD BEARING OF N.23°57'19"W., A CHORD
322 LENGTH OF 28.98', AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 48°55'28"; (5)
323 THENCE N.00°30'27"E. A DISTANCE OF 2402.49'; THENCE
324 N.89°23'59"W. A DISTANCE OF 92.00' TO THE WESTERLY RIGHT OF
325 WAY LINE OF SAID HONORE AVENUE AND TH EAST BOUNDARY LINE OF
Page 13 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
326 HONORE BUSINESS PARK, A LAND CONDOMINIUM AS RECORDED IN
327 CONDOMINIUM BOOK 4, PAGE 31 OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF
328 SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE ALONG SAID EAST BOUNDARY
329 LINE, BEING THE WESTERLY RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF SAID HONORE
330 AVENUE THE FOLLOWING FIVE (5) COURSES: (1)THENCE
331 S.00°31'03"W. A DISTANCE OF 334.73'; (2) THENCE
332 S.15°21'39"W. A DISTANCE OF 52.70'; (3) THENCE
333 S.00°31'03"W. A DISTANCE OF 100.40'; (4) THENCE
334 N.89°28'57"W. A DISTANCE OF 6.50'; (5) THENCE S.00°31'03"W.
335 A DISTANCE OF 38.91' TO THE NORTH SIDE OF ROADWAY C.E. AS
336 SHOWN ON SAID HONORE BUSINESS PARK LAND CONDOMINIUM PLAT;
337 THENCE ALONG THE NORTH LINE OF SAID ROADWAY C.E. THE
338 FOLLOWING EIGHT (8) COURSES: (1) THENCE N.89°28'57"W. A
339 DISTANCE OF 44.09'; (2) THENCE WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE
340 LEFT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 49.61', A RADIUS OF 100.00', A
341 CHORD BEARING OF S.76°18'16"W., A CHORD LENGTH OF 49.11',
342 AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 28°25'35"; (3) THENCE WITH A REVERSE
343 CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 49.61', A
344 RADIUS OF 100.00', A CHORD BEARING OF S.76°18'16"W., A
345 CHORD LENGTH OF 49.11', AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 28°25'35"; (4)
346 THENCE N.89°28'57"W. A DISTANCE OF 111.31'; (5) THENCE WITH
347 A CURVE TURNING TO THE LEFT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 48.37', A
348 RADIUS OF 100.00', A CHORD BEARING OF S.76°39'43"W., A
349 CHORD LENGTH OF 47.90', AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 27°42'41"; (6)
350 THENCE S.62°48'22"W. A DISTANCE OF 136.88'; (7) THENCE WITH
Page 14 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
351 A CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 24.51',
352 A RADIUS OF 50.67', A CHORD BEARING OF S.76°39'43"W., A
353 CHORD LENGTH OF 24.27', AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 27°42'40"; (8)
354 THENCE N.89°28'57"W. A DISTANCE OF 156.75' TO THE WEST
355 BOUNDARY LINE OF SAID HONORE BUSINESS PARK; THENCE
356 N.00°30'01"E. ALONG SAID WEST LINE, A DISTANCE OF 170.75'
357 TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN
358 OFFICIAL RECORDS INSTRUMENT 2025107900; THENCE ALONG THE
359 SOUTH LINE OF SAID PROPERTY THE FOLLOWING FIVE (5) COURSES:
360 (1) THENCE N.89°20'07"W. A DISTANCE OF 304.86'; (2) THENCE
361 N.89°33'04"W. A DISTANCE OF 15.00'; (3) THENCE
362 N.00°26'56"E. A DISTANCE OF 0.11'; (4) THENCE N.89°20'43"W.
363 A DISTANCE OF 319.86'; (5) THENCE N.89°34'10"W. A DISTANCE
364 OF 25.00' TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID PROPERTY; THENCE
365 N.00°25'50"E. ALONG THE WEST BOUNDARY OF SAID PROPERTY, A
366 DISTANCE OF 664.43' TO THE NORTH LINE OF SECTION 2; THENCE
367 S.89°27'05"E., ALONG SAID NORTH LINE, A DISTANCE OF
368 1330.34'; TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING, HAVING AN AREA OF
369 APPROXIMATELY 1,092 ACRES, MORE OR LESS.
370
371 B. Lands in Manatee County, Florida:
372 A PARCEL OF LAND LYING AND BEING IN SECTIONS 25, 35 AND 36,
373 TOWNSHIP 35 SOUTH, RANGE 18 EAST, MANATEE COUNTY, FLORIDA.
374 BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
375
Page 15 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
376 BEGINNING AT THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID SECTION 36;
377 THENCE ALONG THE SOUTH LINE OF SAID SECTION 36 THE
378 FOLLOWING TWO (2) COURSES: (1) THENCE S.89°23'53"E. A
379 DISTANCE OF 2705.83'; (2) THENCE S.89°25'07"E. A DISTANCE
380 OF 441.01'; THENCE N.00°34'53"E. A DISTANCE OF 229.64' TO
381 THE LIMITED ACCESS RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF INTERSTATE 75,
382 (STATE ROAD 93) AS SHOWN ON THE FLORIDA DEPARTMENT OF
383 TRANSPORTATION RIGHT OF WAY MAPS, SECTION 13075-2402;
384 THENCE ALONG SAID LIMITED ACCESS RIGHT OF WAY THE FOLLOWING
385 SEVEN COURSES: (1) THENCE S.89°25'07"E. A DISTANCE OF
386 298.24'; (2) THENCE N.88°17'27"E. A DISTANCE OF 628.42';
387 (3) THENCE WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE LEFT WITH AN ARC
388 LENGTH OF 315.44', A RADIUS OF 216.00', A CHORD BEARING OF
389 N.46°27'17"E., A CHORD LENGTH OF 288.15', AND A DELTA ANGLE
390 OF 83°40'23"; (4) THENCE N.04°37'06"E. A DISTANCE OF
391 450.00'; (5) THENCE WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE LEFT WITH
392 AN ARC LENGTH OF 638.55', A RADIUS OF 3180.04', A CHORD
393 BEARING OF N.03°55'22"W., A CHORD LENGTH OF 637.48', AND A
394 DELTA ANGLE OF 11°30'18"; (6) THENCE N.09°40'31"W. A
395 DISTANCE OF 518.74'; (7) THENCE N.13°40'30"W. A DISTANCE OF
396 4565.88' TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INDIGO RIDGE AT
397 UNIVERSITY PLACE AS RECORD IN PLAT BOOK 41, PAGE 75, OF THE
398 PUBLIC RECORDS OF MANATEE COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE ALONG THE
399 SOUTH LINE OF SAID INDIGO RIDGE AT UNIVERSITY PLACE THE
400 FOLLOWING THREE (3) COURSES: (1) THENCE S.76°19'29"W. A
Page 16 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
401 DISTANCE OF 241.90'; (2) THENCE N.13°40'31"W. A DISTANCE OF
402 50.00'; (3) THENCE S.76°19'29"W. A DISTANCE OF 138.18' TO
403 THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF ASHLEY TRACE AT UNIVERSITY PLACE AS
404 RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 41, PAGE 91, OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF
405 MANATEE COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE ALONG THE EAST LINE OF SAID
406 ASHLEY TRACE AT UNIVERSITY PLACE THE FOLLOWING THREE (3)
407 COURSES: (1) THENCE S.01°35'25"W. A DISTANCE OF 138.18';
408 (2) THENCE S.88°24'35"E. A DISTANCE OF 50.00'; (3) THENCE
409 S.01°35'25"W. A DISTANCE OF 965.34' TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER
410 OF CHARLESTON POINTE PHASE A1 AT UNIVERSITY PLACE AS
411 RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 40, PAGE 49, OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF
412 MANATEE COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE S.00°27'10"W. ALONG THE
413 EAST LINE OF SAID CHARLESTON POINTE PHASE A1 AT UNIVERSITY
414 PLACE, A DISTANCE OF 1910.69' TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF
415 SAID CHARLESTON POINTE PHASE A1 AT UNIVERSITY PLACE AND THE
416 NORTH RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF COOPER CREEK BOULEVARD AS SHOWN
417 IN THE PLAT OF CHALESTON POINTE PHASE "A" AT UNIVERSITY
418 PLACE AS RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 40, PAGE 34, OF THE PUBLIC
419 RECORDS OF MANATEE COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE ALONG SAID NORTH
420 RIGHT OF WAY LINE THE FOLLOWING THREE (3) COURSES:
421 (1)THENCE WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC
422 LENGTH OF 415.48', A RADIUS OF 940.00', A CHORD BEARING OF
423 N.50°49'46"W., A CHORD LENGTH OF 412.11', AND A DELTA ANGLE
424 OF 25°19'30"; (2) THENCE WITH A REVERSE CURVE TURNING TO
425 THE LEFT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 628.15', A RADIUS OF
Page 17 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
426 552.00', A CHORD BEARING OF N.70°45'59"W., A CHORD LENGTH
427 OF 594.80', AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 65°12'00"; (3) THENCE WITH
428 A REVERSE CURVE TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF
429 260.88', A RADIUS OF 1358.00', A CHORD BEARING OF
430 S.82°08'13"W., A CHORD LENGTH OF 260.48', AND A DELTA ANGLE
431 OF 11°00'25"; THENCE S.02°21'34"E. A DISTANCE OF 84.00' TO
432 THE SOUTHERLY RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF COOPER CREEK BOULEVARD
433 AS SHOWN IN THE PLAT OF CHALESTON POINTE PHASE "A" AT
434 UNIVERSITY PLACE AS RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 40, PAGE 34, OF
435 THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF MANATEE COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE ALONG
436 SAID SOUTHERLY RIGHT OF WAY LINE THE FOLLOWING TWO (2)
437 COURSES: (1) THENCE WITH A CURVE TURNING TO THE LEFT WITH
438 AN ARC LENGTH OF 277.02', A RADIUS OF 1442.00', A CHORD
439 BEARING OF N.82°08'13"E., A CHORD LENGTH OF 276.59', AND A
440 DELTA ANGLE OF 11°00'25"; (2) THENCE WITH A REVERSE CURVE
441 TURNING TO THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 123.84', A
442 RADIUS OF 468.00', A CHORD BEARING OF N.84°12'52"E., A
443 CHORD LENGTH OF 123.48', AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 15°09'42" TO
444 THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAVANNAH PRESERVE AT UNIVERSITY
445 PLACE AS RECORDED IN OFFICIAL RECORDS BOOK 2224 PAGE 1318
446 OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF MANATEE COUNTY FLORIDA; THENCE
447 ALONG THE EASTERLY AND SOUTHERLY LINES OF SAID SAVANNAH
448 PRESERVE AT UNIVERSITY PLACE TO FOLLOWING SIX (6) COURSES:
449 (1) THENCE S.06°03'00"W. A DISTANCE OF 528.00'; (2) THENCE
450 N.85°52'00"W. A DISTANCE OF 156.00'; (3) THENCE
Page 18 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
451 N.20°52'00"W. A DISTANCE OF 250.00'; (4) THENCE
452 N.90°00'00"W. A DISTANCE OF 228.00'; (5) THENCE
453 S.18°23'00"W. A DISTANCE OF 892.00'; (6) THENCE
454 S.80°24'00"W. A DISTANCE OF 194.69' TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER
455 OF CAROLINA LANDINGS AS RECORDED IN OFFICIAL RECORD BOOK
456 1979, PAGE 2295 OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF MANATEE COUNTY,
457 FLORIDA; THENCE ALONG THE SOUTHERLY LINE OF SAID CAROLINA
458 LANDINGS THE FOLLOWING TWO (2) COURSES: (1) THENCE
459 S.80°24'00"W. A DISTANCE OF 367.31'; (2) THENCE
460 S.88°35'01"W. A DISTANCE OF 462.44' TO THE WESTERLY RIGHT
461 OF WAY LINE OF HONORE AVENUE AS RECORDED IN OFFICIAL
462 RECORDS BOOK 1461, PAGE 3023 AND OFFICIAL RECORDS BOOK
463 1598, PAGE 1505 OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF MANATEE COUNTY,
464 FLORIDA; THENCE ALONG SAID WESTERLY RIGHT OF WAY LINE THE
465 FOLLOWING TWO (2) COURSES: (1) THENCE S.00°20'22"E. A
466 DISTANCE OF 1317.63'; (2) THENCE WITH A CURVE TURNING TO
467 THE RIGHT WITH AN ARC LENGTH OF 276.87', A RADIUS OF
468 1440.00', A CHORD BEARING OF S.05°10'08"W., A CHORD LENGTH
469 OF 276.45', AND A DELTA ANGLE OF 11°00'59" TO THE SOUTHEAST
470 CORNER OF SABAL BAY CONDOMINIUM PLAT AS RECORDED IN
471 CONDOMINIUM BOOK 33, PAGE 96, OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF
472 MANATEE COUNTY, FLORIDA; THENCE N.89°27'25"W., ALONG THE
473 SOUTH LINE OF SAID SABAL BAY CONDOMINIUM, A DISTANCE OF
474 1550.09' TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID SABAL BAY
475 CONDOMINIUM, AND THE EAST LINE OF A FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT
Page 19 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
476 EASEMENT (160' WIDE), RECORDED IN OFFICIAL RECORDS BOOK
477 996, PAGE 1979, OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF MANATEE COUNTY,
478 FLORIDA; THENCE S.00°26'00"W., ALONG SAID EAST LINE, A
479 DISTANCE OF 950.35' TO A POINT ON THE SOUTH LINE OF SAID
480 SECTION 35; THENCE S.89°27'05"E., ALONG SAID SOUTH LINE, A
481 DISTANCE OF 1405.88'; TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING, HAVING AN
482 AREA OF 16447708.61 SQUARE FEET, 377.587 ACRES.
483
484 C. Excluded lands from the district:
485 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the following lands
486 described below shall be excluded from the district's
487 jurisdictional boundaries:
488
489 (1) Parcel ID: 0036010002 (MOTE)
490 LEGAL DESCRIPTION:
491 COMMENCE AT THE NW CORNER OF THE SE 1/4 OF SECTION 1,
492 TOWNSHIP 36 SOUTH, RANGE 18 EAST, SARASOTA COUNTY, FLORIDA;
493 THENCE S 89°18'11" E, ALONG THE NORTH LINE OF THE SE 1/4 OF
494 SAID SECTION, A DISTANCE OF 177.43 FEET FOR A POINT OF
495 BEGINNING; THENCE CONTINUE S 89°18'11"E, ALONG SAID NORTH
496 LINE, A DISTANCE OF 1128.19 FEET; THENCE S 00°00'13" E, A
497 DISTANCE OF 327.36 FEET; THENCE S 89°59'47" W, A
498 DISTANCE OF 36.47 FEET TO A POINT OF CURVATURE OF A CURVE
499 CONCAVE SOUTHEASTERLY HAVING A RADIUS OF 45.00 FEET; THENCE
500 SOUTHWESTERLY ALONG THE ARC OF SAID CURVE TO THE LEFT
Page 20 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
501 THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF 74°27'17" A DISTANCE OF 58.48
502 FEET TO A POINT OF REVERSE CURVATURE OF A CURVE CONCAVE
503 NORTHWESTERLY HAVING A RADIUS OF 300.00 FEET; THENCE
504 SOUTHWESTERLY ALONG THE ARC OF SAID CURVE TO THE RIGHT
505 THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF 51°16'30" A DISTANCE OF 268.48
506 FEET TO A POINT OF NON-TANGENCY; THENCE N 89°37'27" W, A
507 DISTANCE OF 255.09 FEET; THENCE N 35°53'57" E, A DISTANCE
508 OF 34.55 FEET TO A POINT OF CURVATURE OF A CURVE CONCAVE
509 WESTERLY HAVING A RADIUS OF 540.00 FEET; THENCE NORTHERLY
510 ALONG THE ARC OF SAID CURVE TO THE LEFT THROUGH A CENTRAL
511 ANGLE OF 40°32'31" A DISTANCE OF 382.10 FEET TO A POINT OF
512 COMPOUND CURVATURE OF A CURVE CONCAVE SOUTHWESTERLY HAVING
513 A RADIUS OF 50.00 FEET; THENCE NORTHWESTERLY ALONG THE ARC
514 OF SAID CURVE TO THE LEFT THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF
515 85°31'07" A DISTANCE OF 74.63 FEET TO A POINT OF TANGENCY;
516 THENCE S 89°50'18" W, A DISTANCE OF 463.42 FEET TO A POINT
517 OF CURVATURE OF A CURVE CONCAVE SOUTHEASTERLY HAVING A
518 RADIUS OF 25.00 FEET; THENCE SOUTHWESTERLY ALONG THE ARC OF
519 SAID CURVE TO THE LEFT THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF 89°17'05"
520 A DISTANCE OF 38.96 FEET TO A POINT OF TANGENCY; THENCE S
521 00°33'13" W, A DISTANCE OF 528.07 FEET; THENCE N 89°26'47"
522 W, A DISTANCE OF 71.50 FEET; THENCE S 00°29'40" W, A
523 DISTANCE OF 128.56 FEET TO A POINT OF CURVATURE OF A CURVE
524 CONCAVE NORTHWESTERLY HAVING A RADIUS OF 111.50 FEET;
525 THENCE SOUTHWESTERLY ALONG THE ARC OF SAID CURVE TO THE
Page 21 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
526 RIGHT THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF 56°56'28" A DISTANCE OF
527 110.81 FEET TO A POINT OF NON-TANGENCY; THENCE N 42°14'07"
528 W, A DISTANCE OF 206.65 FEET TO A POINT ON THE ARC OF A
529 CURVE CONCAVE NORTHEASTERLY WHOSE RADIUS POINT LIES N
530 51°08'46" E, A DISTANCE OF 553.95 FEET; THENCE
531 NORTHWESTERLY ALONG THE ARC OF SAID CURVE TO THE RIGHT
532 THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF 10°01'02" A DISTANCE OF 96.85
533 FEET TO A POINT OF NON-TANGENCY; THENCE N 34°58'00" W, A
534 DISTANCE OF 45.27 FEET TO A POINT ON THE ARC OF A CURVE
535 CONCAVE EASTERLY WHOSE RADIUS POINT LIES N 66°32'14" E, A
536 DISTANCE OF 493.10 FEET; THENCE NORTHERLY ALONG THE ARC OF
537 SAID CURVE TO THE RIGHT THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF
538 18°29'43" A DISTANCE OF 159.17 FEET TO A POINT OF NON-
539 TANGENCY; THENCE N 00°30'56" E, A DISTANCE OF 110.89 FEET;
540 THENCE S 89°29'04" E, A DISTANCE OF 63.07 FEET TO A POINT
541 OF CURVATURE OF A CURVE CONCAVE NORTHWESTERLY HAVING A
542 RADIUS OF 50.00 FEET; THENCE NORTHEASTERLY ALONG THE ARC OF
543 SAID CURVE TO THE LEFT THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF 90°30'56"
544 A DISTANCE OF 78.99 FEET TO A POINT OF TANGENCY; THENCE N
545 00°00'00" E, A DISTANCE OF 165.14 FEET TO A POINT OF
546 CURVATURE OF A CURVE CONCAVE EASTERLY HAVING A RADIUS OF
547 50.00 FEET; THENCE NORTHERLY ALONG THE ARC OF SAID CURVE TO
548 THE RIGHT THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF 19°48'33" A DISTANCE
549 OF 17.29 FEET TO A POINT OF REVERSE CURVATURE OF A CURVE
550 CONCAVE WESTERLY HAVING A RADIUS OF 50.00 FEET; THENCE
Page 22 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
551 NORTHERLY ALONG THE ARC OF SAID CURVE TO THE LEFT THROUGH A
552 CENTRAL ANGLE OF 22°11'28" A DISTANCE OF 19.37 FEET TO A
553 POINT OF REVERSE CURVATURE OF A CURVE CONCAVE EASTERLY
554 HAVING A RADIUS OF 50.00 FEET; THENCE NORTHERLY ALONG THE
555 ARC OF SAID CURVE TO THE RIGHT THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF
556 15°48'42" A DISTANCE OF 13.80 FEET TO A POINT OF TANGENCY;
557 THENCE N 13°25'47" E, A DISTANCE OF 27.41 FEET TO A POINT
558 OF CURVATURE OF A CURVE CONCAVE SOUTHEASTERLY HAVING A
559 RADIUS OF 50.00 FEET; THENCE NORTHEASTERLY ALONG THE ARC OF
560 SAID CURVE TO THE RIGHT THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF
561 43°19'54" A DISTANCE OF 37.81 FEET TO A POINT OF TANGENCY;
562 THENCE N 56°45'41" E, A DISTANCE OF 22.41 FEET TO A POINT
563 OF CURVATURE OF A CURVE CONCAVE NORTHWESTERLY HAVING A
564 RADIUS OF 30.00 FEET; THENCE NORTHEASTERLY ALONG THE ARC OF
565 SAID CURVE TO THE LEFT THROUGH A CENTRAL ANGLE OF 56°03'53"
566 A DISTANCE OF 29.36 FEET TO A POINT OF TANGENCY; THENCE N
567 00°41'49" E, A DISTANCE OF 15.38 FEET TO THE INTERSECTION
568 WITH THE NORTH LINE OF SAID SE 1/4 AND THE POINT OF
569 BEGINNING.
570 CONTAINING 512,332.83 SQUARE FEET (11.76 ACRES).
571
572 (2) Parcel ID: 0014002020 (SARASOTA COUNTY PUBLIC HOSPITAL
573 DISTRICT)
574 The Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 1,
575 Township 36 South, Range 18 East, less the right-of-way of
Page 23 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
576 University Parkway and less the right-of-way of Honore
577 Avenue and more particularly described as follows:
578 Commence at a 5" x 5" concrete monument found at the
579 Northwest corner of said Section 1; thence S 00°30'31" W
580 along the West line of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 1,
581 a distance of 206.00 feet to the Southerly right-of-way of
582 University Parkway; thence S89°24'11" E along the Southerly
583 right-of-way of University Parkway, a distance of 46.00
584 feet to the Point of Beginning: (the following five calls
585 are along the Southerly right-of-way of University Parkway)
586 thence S 89°24'11" E, a distance of 342.16 feet, thence S
587 00°35'49" W, a distance of 15.00 feet; thence S 89°24'11"
588 E, a distance of 135.25 feet to the point of curvature of a
589 curve to the left, having a radius of 5847.58 feet and a
590 central angle of 08°05'48"; thence Easterly along the arc
591 of said curve, an arc length of 826.34 feet to the end of
592 said curve; thence N 82°30'34" E, a distance of 6.16 feet
593 to the Easterly line of the Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest
594 1/4 of aforementioned Section 1; thence S 00°30'47" W along
595 said Easterly line and away from the Southerly right-of-way
596 of University Parkway, a distance of 1173.61 feet to the
597 Southeast corner of said Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4
598 of Section 1; thence N 89°21'17" W along the Southerly line
599 of said Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 1, a
600 distance of 1307.08 feet to the Easterly right-of-way line
Page 24 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
601 of Honore Avenue (92' wide); thence N 00°30'31" E along the
602 Easterly right-of-way line of Honore Avenue, a distance of
603 1128.35 feet to the Point of Beginning.
604 LESS and except the right-of-way for Honore Avenue
605 described in Official Records Book 2486, Page 95, and
606 Official Records Instrument 2009001090, Public Records of
607 Sarasota County, Florida. Lying and being in Sarasota
608 County, Florida.
609
610 D. Total district acreage:
611 The total acreage of property within the district's
612 boundaries in Sarasota and Manatee Counties consists of
613 1,469.651 acres, more or less.
614
615 Section 3. Powers of the district.—
616 (1) The district shall have all authority, powers, and
617 duties granted by this charter and by chapters 189 and 197,
618 Florida Statutes, as they may be amended from time to time.
619 (2) The district shall have the authority, power, and
620 duties to provide for drainage and water control. In exercising
621 its authority for drainage and water control, the district shall
622 have the authority provided by, and be subject to, ss. 298.11,
623 298.13, 298.16, 298.17, 298.18, 298.19, 298.20, 298.21, 298.22,
624 298.225, 298.24, 298.25, 298.26, 298.28, 298.301, 298.305,
625 298.329, 298.333, 298.341, 298.345, 298.353, 298.365, 298.366,
Page 25 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
626 298.401, 298.41(1), 298.465, 298.47, 298.48, 298.49, 298.50,
627 298.52, 298.54, 298.56, 298.59, 298.61, 298.62, 298.63, and
628 298.66, Florida Statutes.
629 (3) The district shall have all authority, powers, and
630 duties to provide the following:
631 (a) To construct, operate, and maintain canals, ditches,
632 drains, levees, lakes, ponds, and other works for water
633 management, flood, and drainage control purposes;
634 (b) To acquire, purchase, operate, and maintain pumps,
635 plants, and pumping systems for water management, flood, and
636 drainage control purposes;
637 (c) To construct, operate, and maintain irrigation works,
638 machinery, and plants;
639 (d) To construct and maintain facilities for and take
640 measures to control mosquitoes and other arthropods of public
641 health importance;
642 (e) To levy non-ad valorem assessments, prescribe, fix,
643 establish, and collect rates, fees, rentals, fares, or other
644 charges, and to revise the same from time to time, for the
645 facilities and services furnished or to be furnished by the
646 district and to recover the cost of making connection to any
647 district facility or system;
648 (f) To provide for the discontinuance of service and
649 reasonable penalties, including attorney fees, against any user
650 or property for any such rates, fees, rentals, fares, or other
Page 26 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
651 charges that become delinquent and require collection. However,
652 no charges or fees shall be established until after a public
653 hearing of the Board of Supervisors at the district at which all
654 affected persons shall be given an opportunity to be heard;
655 (g) To enter into agreements with any person, firm, or
656 corporation for the furnishing by such person, firm, or
657 corporation of any facilities and services of the type provided
658 for in this act;
659 (h) To finance, fund, plan, establish, acquire, construct
660 or reconstruct, enlarge or extend, equip, operate, and maintain
661 additional systems and facilities for conservation areas,
662 mitigation areas, and wildlife habitat, including the
663 maintenance of any plant or animal species, and any related
664 interest in real or personal property;
665 (i) To borrow money and issue negotiable or other bonds of
666 the district as hereinafter provided; to borrow money, from time
667 to time, and issue negotiable or other notes of the district
668 therefore, bearing interest at a rate not exceeding the maximum
669 interest allowable by law, in anticipation of the collection of
670 assessments or revenues of the district; to pledge assessments
671 and revenues to secure such bonds, notes, or obligations; and to
672 sell, discount, negotiate, and dispose of the same;
673 (j) To exercise all other powers necessary, convenient, or
674 proper in connection with any of the powers or duties of the
675 district stated in this act. The powers and duties of the
Page 27 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
676 district shall be exercised by and through the Board of
677 Supervisors. The Board of Supervisors shall have the authority
678 to employ engineers, attorneys, agents, employees, and
679 representatives as the Board of Supervisors may, from time to
680 time, determine, and to fix their compensation and duties;
681 (k) To receive grants and contributions from public and
682 private sources;
683 (l) To sue and be sued by its name in any court of law or
684 in equity, to make contracts, to adopt and use a corporate seal,
685 and to alter the same at pleasure;
686 (m) To acquire by purchase or gift real and personal
687 property, either or both, within or without the district, and to
688 convey and dispose of such real and personal property, either or
689 both, as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the
690 purposes, or any of the purposes, of this act;
691 (4) The district shall have authority to employ staff to
692 discharge its responsibilities, including, but not limited to,
693 staff necessary to exercise the authority and discharge its
694 duties under subsections (2) and (3). Employees of the district
695 shall serve at the pleasure of the district board.
696 (5) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the district shall not
697 have the power of condemnation.
698 Section 4. Board of Supervisors, organization, powers,
699 duties, terms of office, and compensation.—
700 (1) The district shall be governed by a five-member Board
Page 28 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
701 of Supervisors, elected on a one-acre, one-vote basis by the
702 landowners in the district.
703 (2) Prior to taking any district action, a quorum must be
704 present. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum.
705 (3) Except as provided in subsection (8) for the initial
706 landowners' meeting, the election of the district's Board of
707 Supervisors shall be on a one-acre, one-vote basis pursuant to
708 s. 298.11, Florida Statutes, as amended from time to time.
709 (4) Each year during the month of June, supervisors shall
710 be elected by the landowners of the district to fill the seat or
711 seats of supervisors whose terms have expired. All vacancies or
712 expirations on the board shall be filled as required by this act
713 and chapter 298, Florida Statutes.
714 (5) Except for the initial landowners' meeting provided
715 for in subsection (8), each supervisor shall hold office for a
716 term of 3 years and until his or her successor is duly elected
717 or appointed and qualified.
718 (6) The supervisors of said University Town Center
719 Improvement District shall be residents of the State of Florida
720 and citizens of the United States.
721 (7) In case of a vacancy in the office of any supervisor,
722 the remaining supervisors may fill such vacancy by appointment
723 until the next annual meeting of the landowners, when his or her
724 successor shall be elected by the landowners for the unexpired
725 term.
Page 29 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
726 (8) At the initial landowners' meeting, the landowners
727 shall, at such election, determine the length of the terms of
728 office of each initial supervisor so elected by them.
729 Respectively, there shall be one 1-year term, two 2-year terms,
730 and two 3-year terms. Thereafter, all terms of supervisors shall
731 be for 3 years. All supervisors shall serve until their
732 successors have been elected or appointed and qualified.
733 (9) Except as provided in subsection (8), the procedures
734 for conducting district elections and for qualification of
735 electors shall be pursuant to this act and chapters 189 and 298,
736 Florida Statutes, as they may be amended from time to time.
737 (10) Whenever any election shall be authorized or required
738 by this act or chapter 298, Florida Statutes, to be held by the
739 landowners at any particular or stated time or day, and if for
740 any reason such election shall not or cannot be held at such
741 time or on such day, then in such event, the power or duty to
742 hold such election shall not cease or lapse, but such election
743 shall be held thereafter as soon as practicable and consistent
744 with this act.
745 (11) The administrative duties of the Board of Supervisors
746 shall be as set forth in this act and chapter 298, Florida
747 Statutes, as they may be amended from time to time.
748 (12) The compensation of the supervisors shall be governed
749 by this act and chapter 298, Florida Statutes, as they may be
750 amended from time to time.
Page 30 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
751 (13) The supervisors shall be required to comply with the
752 requirements for financial disclosure, meeting notices,
753 reporting, public records maintenance, and per diem expenses for
754 officers and employees as set forth in chapters 112, 119, 189,
755 286, and 298, Florida Statutes, as they may be amended from time
756 to time.
757 Section 5. Meetings of landowners; election of
758 supervisors.—
759 (1) Each year during the month of June, beginning with
760 June 2026, an annual meeting of the landowners of the district
761 shall be held for the purpose of electing a supervisor or
762 supervisors and hearing reports of the Board of Supervisors. At
763 each annual meeting, the Board of Supervisors shall report on
764 all work undertaken or completed during the preceding year, and
765 the status of the finances of the district.
766 (2) As soon as practicable after their election, the Board
767 of Supervisors of the district shall organize by choosing one of
768 their members to serve as president of the Board of Supervisors
769 and by electing some suitable person, who may or may not be a
770 supervisor, to serve as secretary. The Board of Supervisors
771 shall adopt a seal, which shall be the seal of the district.
772 (3) Only landowners with taxable acreage in the district
773 who are not exempt or immune from taxes or assessments shall be
774 considered electors entitled to vote at any landowner meeting
775 and election. Such landowners representing a majority of the
Page 31 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
776 taxable acreage who are present or are represented by proxy at
777 landowner meetings constitute a quorum at any meeting of the
778 landowners.
779 Section 6. Non-ad valorem assessments.—
780 (1) Non-ad Valorem Assessments.—Non-ad valorem assessments
781 for the construction, operation, or maintenance of district
782 facilities, services, and operations shall be assessed, levied,
783 and collected pursuant to chapter 170, chapter 197, or chapter
784 298, Florida Statutes, as amended from time to time.
785 (2) Assessments and Costs; Lien on Land Against Which
786 Levied.—All assessments provided for in this act, together with
787 all penalties for default in payment of the same, and all costs
788 in collecting the same, shall, from the date of assessment
789 thereof until paid, constitute a lien of equal dignity with the
790 liens for county taxes, and other taxes of equal dignity with
791 county taxes, upon all the lands against which such taxes shall
792 be levied as provided in this charter.
793 (3) Levies of Non-ad Valorem Assessments on Lands Less
794 than One (1) Acre.—In levying and assessing all assessments,
795 each tract or parcel of land less than one (1) acre in area
796 shall be assessed as a full acre, and each tract or parcel of
797 land more than one (1) acre in area which contains a fraction of
798 an acre shall be assessed at the nearest whole number of acres,
799 a fraction of one half or more to be assessed as a full acre.
800 (4) Compensation of Property Appraisers, Tax Collectors,
Page 32 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
801 and Clerks of Circuit Court.—The property appraisers, tax
802 collectors, and clerks of the circuit court of Sarasota and
803 Manatee Counties shall be entitled to compensation for services
804 performed in connection with taxes and assessments of the
805 district as provided by general law.
806 Section 7. When unpaid assessments delinquent; penalty.—
807 All assessments provided for in this charter shall be and become
808 delinquent and bear penalties on the amount of said taxes in the
809 same manner as county taxes.
810 Section 8. Enforcement of assessments.—The collection and
811 enforcement of all assessments levied by the district shall be
812 at the same time and in like manner as county taxes, and the
813 provisions of the Florida Statutes relating to the sale of lands
814 for unpaid and delinquent county taxes, the issuance, sale, and
815 delivery of tax certificates for such unpaid and delinquent
816 county taxes, the redemption thereof, the issuance to
817 individuals of tax deeds based thereon, and all other procedure
818 in connection therewith, shall be applicable to the district and
819 the delinquent and unpaid taxes of the district to the same
820 extent as if said statutory provisions were expressly set forth
821 in this charter. All assessments shall be subject to the same
822 discounts as county taxes.
823 Section 9. Issuance of bonds.—
824 (1) Issuance of Revenue Bonds, Assessment Bonds, and Bond
825 Anticipation Notes.—
Page 33 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
826 (a) In addition to the other powers provided to the
827 district, and not in limitation thereof, the district shall have
828 the power, pursuant to chapter 298, Florida Statutes, and
829 applicable general law as amended from time to time, at any
830 time, and, from time to time, after the issuance of any bonds of
831 the district shall have been authorized, to borrow money for the
832 purposes for which such bonds are to be issued in anticipation
833 of the receipt of the proceeds of the sale of such bonds and to
834 issue bond anticipation notes in a principal sum not in excess
835 of the authorized maximum amount of such bond issue.
836 (b) Pursuant to chapter 298, Florida Statutes, and
837 applicable general law as amended from time to time, the
838 district shall have the power to issue assessment bonds and
839 revenue bonds, from time to time, without limitation as to the
840 amount for the purpose of financing the infrastructure, systems,
841 and facilities provided for in section 3. Such revenue bonds may
842 be secured by, or payable from, the gross or net pledge of the
843 revenues to be derived from any project or combination of
844 projects; from the rates, fees, or other charges to be collected
845 from the users of any project or projects; from any revenue-
846 producing undertaking or activity of the district; from special
847 assessments; or from any other source or pledged security. Such
848 bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness of the district, and
849 the approval of the qualified electors shall not be required
850 unless such bonds are additionally secured by the full faith and
Page 34 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
851 credit and taxing power of the district.
852 (c) Any issue of bonds may be secured by a trust agreement
853 by and between the district and a corporate trustee or trustees,
854 which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a
855 trust company within or without this state. The resolution
856 authorizing the issuance of the bonds or such trust agreement
857 may pledge the revenues to be received from any projects of the
858 district and may contain such provisions for protecting and
859 enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as the
860 board may approve, including, without limitation, covenants
861 setting forth the duties of the district in relation to the
862 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, stewardship,
863 improvement, maintenance, repair, operation, and insurance of
864 any projects; the fixing and revising of the rates, fees, and
865 charges; and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all
866 moneys; and for the employment of consulting engineers in
867 connection with such acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
868 stewardship, improvement, maintenance, repair, or operation.
869 (d) Bonds of each issue shall be dated; shall bear
870 interest at such rate or rates, including variable rates, which
871 interest may be tax exempt or taxable for federal income tax
872 purposes; shall mature at such time or times from their date or
873 dates; and may be made redeemable before maturity at such price
874 or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be
875 determined by the board.
Page 35 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
876 (e) The district shall have the power to issue bonds for
877 the purpose of refunding any outstanding bonds of the district.
878 (2) General Obligation Bonds.—
879 (a) Pursuant to this charter, the district shall have the
880 power from time to time to issue general obligation bonds to
881 finance or refinance capital projects.
882 (b) If the board determines to issue general obligation
883 bonds for more than one capital project, the approval of the
884 issuance of the bonds for each and all such projects may be
885 submitted to the elector on one and the same ballot. The failure
886 of the electors to approve the issuance of bonds for any one or
887 more of the capital projects shall not defeat the approval of
888 bonds for any capital project that has been approved by the
889 electors.
890 (c) In arriving at the amount of general obligation bonds
891 permitted to be outstanding at any one time pursuant to
892 paragraph (a), there shall not be included any general
893 obligation bonds that are additionally secured by the pledge of
894 special assessments levied in the amount sufficient to pay the
895 principal and interest on a general obligation bond so
896 additionally secured, which assessments have been equalized and
897 confirmed by resolution or ordinance of the board pursuant to s.
898 170.08, Florida Statutes.
899 Section 10. Minimum charter requirements.—
900 (1) The district is organized and exists for all purposes
Page 36 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
901 set forth in this charter and chapter 298, Florida Statutes, as
902 they may be amended from time to time.
903 (2) The powers, functions, and duties of the district
904 regarding non-ad valorem assessments, bond issuance, other
905 revenue-raising capabilities, budget preparation and approval,
906 liens and foreclosure of liens, use of tax deeds and tax
907 certificates as appropriate for non-ad valorem assessments, and
908 contractual agreements shall be as set forth in chapters 170,
909 189, and 298, Florida Statutes, or any other applicable general
910 or special law, as they may be amended from time to time. The
911 district shall not have the power to levy ad valorem taxes.
912 (3) The district is created by special act of the
913 Legislature, in accordance with chapters 189 and 298, Florida
914 Statutes.
915 (4) The district's charter may be amended only by special
916 act of the Legislature.
917 (5) In accordance with chapter 189, Florida Statutes, this
918 charter, and s. 298.11, Florida Statutes, the district is
919 governed by a five-member board, elected on a one-acre, one-vote
920 basis by the landowners in the district. The membership and
921 organization of the board shall be as set forth in this charter
922 and chapter 298, Florida Statutes, as they may be amended from
923 time to time.
924 (6) The compensation of board members shall be governed by
925 this charter and chapter 298, Florida Statutes, as they may be
Page 37 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
926 amended from time to time.
927 (7) The administrative duties of the Board of Supervisors
928 shall be as set forth in this charter and chapter 298, Florida
929 Statutes, as they may be amended from time to time.
930 (8) Requirements for financial disclosure, meeting
931 notices, reporting, public records maintenance, and per diem
932 expenses for officers and employees shall be as set forth in
933 chapters 112, 189, 286, and 298, Florida Statutes, as amended
934 from time to time.
935 (9) The procedures and requirements governing the issuance
936 of bonds, notes, and other evidence of indebtedness by the
937 district shall be as set forth in chapter 298, Florida Statutes,
938 and applicable general laws, as they may be amended from time to
939 time.
940 (10) The procedures for conducting district elections and
941 for qualification of electors shall be pursuant to this charter
942 and chapters 189 and 298, Florida Statutes, as they may be
943 amended from time to time.
944 (11) The district may be financed by any method
945 established in this charter, chapter 298, Florida Statutes, and
946 applicable general laws, as they may be amended from time to
947 time.
948 (12) The methods for collecting non-ad valorem
949 assessments, fees, or service charges shall be as set forth in
950 chapters 197 and 298, Florida Statutes, and other applicable
Page 38 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
951 general laws, as they may be amended from time to time.
952 (13) The district's planning requirements shall be as set
953 forth in this charter.
954 (14) The district's geographic boundary limitations shall
955 be as set forth in this charter.
956 Section 11. Boundary changes.—Notwithstanding the
957 provisions of general or other special law, the district's
958 boundaries may be contracted and acreage may be removed from the
959 district when commercial or multifamily acreage is converted to
960 a residential condominium use. The district boundary contraction
961 shall occur only after the residential conversion is recorded
962 with the applicable county clerk of court, and the district's
963 Board of Supervisors has approved of the district's boundary
964 contraction by a supermajority vote. If approved, the Board of
965 Supervisors shall adopt a resolution describing the revised
966 contracted district boundary, inclusive of a map, and setting
967 forth the acreage removed from the district. The resolution of
968 Board of Supervisors shall be posted on the district's website
969 in accordance with section 189.069, Florida Statutes, and
970 transmitted to Sarasota and Manatee Counties, the county tax
971 collectors and property appraisers, and the county sheriffs.
972 Annexation by any municipality of any lands within the district
973 is prohibited.
974 Section 12. Severability.—If any provision of this charter
975 or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held
Page 39 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4091 2026 Legislature
976 invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
977 applications of the charter which can be given effect without
978 the invalid provision or application, and to this end the
979 provisions of this charter are declared severable. In the event
980 of a conflict between the provisions of this charter and the
981 provisions of any other act, the provisions of this charter
982 shall control to the extent of such conflict.
983 Section 5. If this act is approved by a majority of the
984 landowners who are not exempt or immune from ad valorem taxes or
985 non-ad valorem assessments who are present at a landowners
986 meeting to be held within 20 days after section 6 becomes a law,
987 the landowners shall conduct a landowner meeting to address the
988 remaining requirements set forth within s. 298.11, Florida
989 Statutes.
990 Section 6. Except for this section and sections 1 and 2,
991 which shall take effect upon becoming a law, this act shall take
992 effect only upon approval by a majority vote of those landowners
993 who are not exempt or immune from ad valorem taxes or non-ad
994 valorem assessments who are present at a landowner meeting to be
995 held within 20 days after this section becomes a law.
Page 40 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4091 -02-er